test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mipit_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mîpit - ok : # -m inanimate noun
     
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nîpit
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kîpit
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: wîpit
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: wîpitiyiw
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nîpitinân
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kîpitinaw
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kîpitiwâw
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: wîpitiwâw
     mîpit+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: wîpitiyiw

     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: nîpita
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: kîpita
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: wîpita
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: wîpitiyiwa
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: nîpitinâna
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: kîpitinawa
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: kîpitiwâwa
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: wîpitiwâwa
     mîpit+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: wîpitiyiwa
